sv: Konfiguration av bastrummans huvud: Dubbla skinn (slag- + resonansskinn); Utan skinn/övning/dämpad; Enkelt skinn (endast slagskinn); Enkelt skinn (endast resonansskinn); Övrigt
pt-PT: Configuração da pele do bombo: Pele dupla (batedeira e ressonante); Sem pele/prática/silenciado; Pele simples (apenas batedeira); Pele simples (apenas ressonante); Outro
pl: Konfiguracja membrany stopy perkusyjnej: Podwójny naciąg (uderzany + rezonansowy); Bez naciągu / treningowy / wyciszony; Pojedynczy naciąg (tylko uderzany); Pojedynczy naciąg (tylko rezonansowy); Inna
el: Διαμόρφωση κεφαλής μπάσου τυμπάνου: Διπλό δέρμα (κρούσης + συντονισμού); Χωρίς δέρμα / εξάσκησης / με σιγαστήρα; Μονό δέρμα (μόνο κρούσης); Μονό δέρμα (μόνο συντονισμού); Άλλο
nl: Bassdrumvel configuratie: Dubbel vel (slag- en resonantievel); Zonder vel / oefenvel / gedempt; Enkel vel (alleen slagvel); Enkel vel (alleen resonantievel); Overig
fr: Configuration des peaux de la grosse caisse: Peau double (frappe + résonance); Sans peau / pratique / sourdine; Peau simple (frappe uniquement); Peau simple (résonance uniquement); Autre
th: การจัดวางหนังกลองเบส: หัวคู่ (ตี + สะท้อน); ไม่มีหัว/ซ้อม/ปิดเสียง; หัวเดียว (ตีเท่านั้น); หัวเดียว (สะท้อนเท่านั้น); อื่นๆ
nb: Konfigurasjon av basstrommeskinn: Dobbeltsidig skinn (slagskinn + resonansskinn); Uten skinn / øving / dempet; Enkeltsidig skinn (kun slagskinn); Enkeltsidig skinn (kun resonansskinn); Annet
fi: Bassorummun kalvon kokoonpano: Kaksikalvoinen (lyönti ja resonanssi); Ilman kalvoa / harjoitus / vaimennettu; Yksikalvoinen (vain lyöntikalvo); Yksikalvoinen (vain resonanssikalvo); Muu
vi: Cấu hình mặt trống bass: Mặt kép (mặt đập + mặt cộng hưởng); Không mặt / tập luyện / giảm âm; Mặt đơn (chỉ mặt đập); Mặt đơn (chỉ mặt cộng hưởng); Khác
en: Bass drum head configuration: Double head (batter + resonant); Headless / practice / muted; Single head (batter only); Single head (resonant only); Other
es: Configuración del parche del bombo: Doble parche (batidor + resonante); Sin parche / de práctica / silenciado; Un solo parche (solo batidor); Un solo parche (solo resonante); Otro
lt-LT: Bosinio būgno membranos konfigūracija: Dviguba membrana (mušamoji + rezonansinė); Be membranos / treniruočių / nutildytas; Vienguba membrana (tik mušamoji); Vienguba membrana (tik rezonansinė); Kita
ja: バスドラムヘッドの構造: ダブルヘッド (打面 + 共鳴面); ヘッドなし / 練習用 / ミュート; シングルヘッド (打面のみ); シングルヘッド (共鳴面のみ); その他
sk-SK: Konfigurácia blany basového bubna: Dvojitá blana (úderová + rezonančná); Bez blany/cvičné/tlmené; Jednoduchá blana (iba úderová); Jednoduchá blana (iba rezonančná); Iné
da: Konfiguration af stortrommeskind: Dobbelt skind (slag- + resonansskind); Uden skind / øvelse / dæmpet; Enkelt skind (kun slagskind); Enkelt skind (kun resonansskind); Andet
hu: Nagydob fejkonfigurációja: Dupla bőrös (ütő- + rezonánsbőr); Bőr nélküli / gyakorló / némított; Szimpla bőrös (csak ütőbőr); Szimpla bőrös (csak rezonánsbőr); Egyéb
cs: Konfigurace blány basového bubnu: Dvojitá (úderová a rezonanční); Bez blány / cvičná / tlumená; Jednoduchá blána (pouze úderová); Jednoduchá blána (pouze rezonanční); Jiné
bg-BG: Конфигурация на кожата на бас барабана: Двойна кожа (ударна + резонираща); Без кожа / за упражнения / заглушена; Единична кожа (само ударна); Единична кожа (само резонираща); Друго
tr: Bas davul derisi konfigürasyonu: Çift deri (vurma + rezonans); Derisiz / pratik / susturulmuş; Tek deri (sadece vurma); Tek deri (sadece rezonans); Diğer
de: Bassdrumfell-Konfiguration: Doppelfell (Schlag- + Resonanzfell); Ohne Fell / Übung / Gedämpft; Einzelfell (nur Schlagfell); Einzelfell (nur Resonanzfell); Sonstige
sl-SI: Konfiguracija glave bas bobna: Dvojna opna (udarna + resonančna); Brez opne/za vajo/zadušeno; Enojna opna (samo udarna); Enojna opna (samo resonančna); Drugo
ru: Конфигурация барабанной головки бас-барабана: Двойной пластик (ударный + резонансный); Без пластика / тренировочный / приглушенный; Одинарный пластик (только ударный); Одинарный пластик (только резонансный); Другое
it: configurazione della pelle del tamburo della grancassa: Doppia pelle (battente e risonante); Senza pelle / pratica / silenziato; Singola pelle (solo battente); Singola pelle (solo risonante); Altro
zh-CN: 低音鼓鼓皮配置: 双皮（打击面 + 共鸣面）; 无皮/练习/静音; 单皮（仅打击面）; 单皮（仅共鸣面）; 其他
hr-HR: Konfiguracija glave bas-bubnja: Dvostruka opna (za udaranje i rezonantna); Bez opne / za vježbu / prigušeno; Jednostruka opna (samo za udaranje); Jednostruka opna (samo rezonantna); Ostalo
ko: 베이스 드럼 헤드 구성: 더블 헤드(배터 + 공명); 헤드 없음/연습용/뮤트; 싱글 헤드(배터 전용); 싱글 헤드(공명 전용); 기타
ro-RO: Configurația capului tobei bas: Față dublă (bătătoare + rezonantă); Fără față / antrenament / silențios; O singură față (doar bătătoare); O singură față (doar rezonantă); Altele
zh-TW: 大鼓鼓皮配置: 雙鼓皮 (打擊面 + 共鳴面); 無鼓皮 / 練習用 / 靜音; 單鼓皮 (僅打擊面); 單鼓皮 (僅共鳴面); 其他
pt-BR: Configuração da pele do bumbo: Pele dupla (batedeira e resposta); Sem pele/prática/mudo; Pele simples (apenas batedeira); Pele simples (apenas resposta); Outros